__1st_try_roman_lexica__/punc.lexc
!!!punc.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Punc

LEXICON Root
Punc;

LEXICON PuncInf
+Punc:0 #;

LEXICON Punc
!Lexical items from corpus
!	PuncInf;
–	PuncInf;
15	PuncInf;
....	PuncInf;
mt'dd	PuncInf;
}	PuncInf;
...	PuncInf;
w	PuncInf;
]	PuncInf;
'	PuncInf;
{	PuncInf;
.‬	PuncInf;
,	PuncInf;
....	PuncInf;
;	PuncInf;
?	PuncInf;
!	PuncInf;
"	PuncInf;
%	PuncInf;
&	PuncInf;
)	PuncInf;
(	PuncInf;
-	PuncInf;
/	PuncInf;
.	PuncInf;
?‬	PuncInf;
:	PuncInf;
<	PuncInf;
>	PuncInf;
ke	PuncInf;
ŕtl	PuncInf;
[	PuncInf;
٬	PuncInf;
”	PuncInf;
“	PuncInf;
}	PuncInf;
